Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 2. Registration and Maintenance Requirements

§ 2921.
Candidates; registration; checking account; treasurer.

Each candidate who has made expenditures or accepted contributions of $500.00 or more in an election cycle shall register with the Secretary of State within 10 days of reaching the $500.00 threshold or on the date that the next report is required of the candidate under this chapter, whichever occurs first, stating his or her full name and address; the office the candidate is seeking; the name and address of the bank in which the candidate maintains his or her campaign checking account; and the name and address of the treasurer responsible for maintaining the checking account. A candidate’s treasurer may be the candidate or his or her spouse.

All expenditures by a candidate shall be paid by either a credit card or a debit card, check, or other electronic transfer from the single campaign checking account in the bank designated by the candidate under subsection (a) of this section, or, if under $250.00, the candidate may make the expenditure from cash from that campaign checking account if accompanied by a receipt, a copy of which shall be maintained by the candidate for at least two years from the end of the election cycle in which the expenditure was made. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the payment of fees required to be made from a separately held online account designated solely to collect campaign contributions made to the candidate.

As used in this section, “election cycle” means:

in the case of a general or local election, the period that begins 38 days after the previous general or local election for the office and ends 38 days after the general or local election for the office for which that person is a candidate, and includes any primary or run-off election related to that general or local election; or

in the case of a special election, the period that begins on the date the special election for the office was ordered and ends 38 days after that special election, and includes any special primary or run-off election related to that special election.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2922.
Political committees; registration; checking account; treasurer.

Each political committee shall register with the Secretary of State within 10 days of making expenditures of $1,000.00 or more and accepting contributions of $1,000.00 or more stating its full name and address; the name and address of the bank in which it maintains its campaign checking account; and the name and address of the treasurer responsible for maintaining the checking account.
(a) (1) Each political committee shall register with the Secretary of State within 10 days of making expenditures of $1,000.00 or more and accepting contributions of $1,000.00 or more stating its full name and address; the name and address of the bank in which it maintains its campaign checking account; and the name and address of the treasurer responsible for maintaining the checking account.

In addition to the requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection, a legislative leadership political committee shall designate in its registration that it is established as a legislative leadership political committee.
(2) (A) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection, a legislative leadership political committee shall designate in its registration that it is established as a legislative leadership political committee.

The Secretary of State shall provide on his or her website a list of all legislative leadership political committees that have been designated as provided in this subdivision (2).

All expenditures by a political committee shall be paid by either a credit card or a debit card, check, or other electronic transfer from the single campaign checking account in the bank designated by the political committee under subsection (a) of this section, or, if under $250.00, the political committee may make the expenditure from cash from that campaign checking account if accompanied by a receipt, a copy of which shall be maintained by the political committee for at least two years from the end of the two-year general election cycle in which the expenditure was made. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the payment of fees required to be made from a separately held online account designated solely to collect campaign contributions made to the political committee.

A political committee whose principal place of business or whose treasurer is not located in this State shall file a statement with the Secretary of State designating a person who resides in this State upon whom may be served any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the political committee. This statement shall be filed at the same time as the registration required in subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014; amended

2015, No. 49

, § 10.

§ 2923.
Political parties; registration; checking accounts; treasurer.

Each political party that has accepted contributions or made expenditures of $1,000.00 or more in any two-year general election cycle shall register with the Secretary of State within 10 days of reaching the $1,000.00 threshold. In its registration, the party shall state its full name and address, the name and address of the bank in which it maintains its campaign checking account, and the name and address of the treasurer responsible for maintaining the checking account.
(a) (1) Each political party that has accepted contributions or made expenditures of $1,000.00 or more in any two-year general election cycle shall register with the Secretary of State within 10 days of reaching the $1,000.00 threshold. In its registration, the party shall state its full name and address, the name and address of the bank in which it maintains its campaign checking account, and the name and address of the treasurer responsible for maintaining the checking account.

A political party may permit any subsidiary, branch, or local unit of the political party to maintain its own checking account. If a subsidiary, branch, or local unit of a political party is so permitted, it shall file with the Secretary of State within five days of establishing the checking account its full name and address, the name of the political party, the name and address of the bank in which it maintains its campaign checking account, and the name and address of the treasurer responsible for maintaining the checking account.

All expenditures by a political party or its subsidiary, branch, or local unit shall be paid by either a credit card or a debit card, check, or other electronic transfer from the single campaign checking account in the bank designated by the political party, subsidiary, branch, or local unit under subsection (a) of this section, or if under $250.00, the political party, subsidiary, branch, or local unit may make the expenditure from cash from that campaign checking account if accompanied by a receipt, a copy of which shall be maintained by the political party, subsidiary, branch, or local unit for at least two years from the end of the two-year general election cycle in which the expenditure was made. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the payment of fees required to be made from a separately held online account designated solely to collect campaign contributions made to the political party, subsidiary, branch, or local unit.

A political party or its subsidiary, branch, or local unit whose principal place of business or whose treasurer is not located in this State shall file a statement with the Secretary of State designating a person who resides in this State upon whom may be served any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the political party, subsidiary, branch, or local unit. This statement shall be filed at the same time as the registration required in subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2924.
Candidates; surplus campaign funds; new campaign accounts.

A candidate who has surplus funds after all campaign debts have been paid shall not convert the surplus to personal use, other than to reduce personal campaign debts or as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Surplus funds in a candidate’s account shall be:

contributed to other candidates, political parties, or political committees subject to the contribution limits set forth in this chapter;

contributed to a charity;

contributed to the Secretary of State Services Fund;

rolled over into a new campaign or be carried forward for surplus maintenance as provided in subsection (d) of this section; or

liquidated using a combination of the provisions set forth in subdivisions (1)-(4) of this subsection.

The “final report” of a candidate shall indicate the amount of the surplus and how it has been liquidated.

A candidate who chooses to roll over any surplus into a new campaign for public office shall close out his or her former campaign by converting all debts and assets to the new campaign.
(d) (1) (A) A candidate who chooses to roll over any surplus into a new campaign for public office shall close out his or her former campaign by converting all debts and assets to the new campaign.

A candidate who does not intend to be a candidate in a subsequent election but who chooses to carry forward any surplus shall maintain that surplus by closing out his or her former campaign and converting all debts and assets to surplus maintenance.

The candidate may use his or her former campaign’s treasurer and bank account for the new campaign under subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection or the maintenance of surplus under subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection. A candidate shall be required to file a new bank designation form only if there has been a change in the treasurer or the location of the campaign account.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.

§ 2925.
Political committees; surplus campaign funds.

A member of a political committee that has surplus funds after all campaign debts have been paid shall not convert the surplus to personal use.

Surplus funds in a political committee’s account shall be:

contributed to other candidates, political parties, or political committees subject to the contribution limits set forth in this chapter;

contributed to a charity;

contributed to the Secretary of State Services Fund; or

liquidated using a combination of the provisions set forth in subdivisions (1)-(3) of this subsection.

The “final report” of a political committee shall indicate the amount of the surplus and how it has been liquidated.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 23, 2014.